Tennessee, session 114, HB2110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-204(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) Magnetic resonance imaging and positron emission tomography that are not
used for diagnostic purposes do not require a license under this part.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-204(a)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (R) and (S) and substituting:
(R) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4), magnetic resonance imaging; or
(S) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4), positron emission tomography.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2110
012384
- 1 -